District of Columbia statutes.
10-619

Program of construction to meet capital needs authorized; contents.

A program of construction to meet capital needs of the government of the District of Columbia is hereby authorized. Such program shall include, without limitation, projects relating to activities to meet the needs of the public in the fields of education, health, welfare, public safety, recreation, and other general government activities.

June 6, 1958, 72 Stat. 183, Pub. L. 85-451, § 1
Aug. 27, 1963, 77 Stat. 130, Pub. L. 88-104, § 2(a), (b)
Sept. 8, 1965, 79 Stat. 665, Pub. L. 89-173, § 5(b)
Sept. 30, 1966, 80 Stat. 857, Pub. L. 89-610, title VI, § 601
Nov. 7, 1966, 80 Stat. 1434, Pub. L. 89-791, title III, § 301(b)
Nov. 3, 1967, 81 Stat. 339, Pub. L. 90-120, title II, §§ 201, 202
Dec. 9, 1969, 83 Stat. 321, Pub. L. 91-143, § 4(b)
Jan. 5, 1971, 84 Stat. 1930, Pub. L. 91-650, title I, § 103(a)
July 13, 1972, 86 Stat. 466, Pub. L. 92-349, title II, § 201(b)
Oct. 21, 1972, 86 Stat. 1002, Pub. L. 92-517, title II, § 201(b)
Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 832, Pub. L. 93-198, title VII,§ 743(a)
Appropriations, public higher educational institutions, see § 38-1106.
Multiyear capital improvements plan, see § 1-204.44.
This section is referenced in § 38-1106.
1981 Ed., § 9-219.
1973 Ed., § 9-220.

Appropriations authorized: Public Law 103-334, 108 Stat. 2581, the District of Columbia Appropriations Act, 1995, provided for construction projects $5,600,000, as authorized by §§ 34-2405.01 through 34-2405.08; the District of Columbia Public Works Act of 1954, approved May 18, 1954 (68 Stat. 101; Public Law 83-364 [34-2413.08 and 34-2413.10] ); §§ 10-610 and 47-3404) [section 3(g) of the District of Columbia Motor Vehicle Parking Facility Act of 1942, approved August 20, 1958 (72 Stat. 686; Public Law 85-692; D.C. Code, sec 40-805(7)); and the National Capital Transportation Act of 1969, approved December 9, 1969 (83 Stat. 320; Public Law 91-143; D.C. Code, secs. 9-1111.01, 9-1111.02, 9-1111.03, 9-1111.04 and 9-1111.05)]; including acquisition of sites, preparation of plans and specifications, conducting preliminary surveys, erection of structures, including building improvement and alteration and treatment of grounds, to remain available until expended: Provided, That $140,000 shall be available for project management and $110,000 shall be available for design by the Director of the Department of Public Works or by contract for architectural engineering services, as may be determined by the Mayor: Provided further, That funds for use of each capital project implementing agency shall be managed and controlled in accordance with all procedures and limitations established under the Financial Management System: Provided further, That all funds provided by this appropriation title shall be available only for the specific projects and purposes intended: Provided further, That notwithstanding the foregoing, all authorizations for capital outlay projects, except those projects covered by the first sentence of section 23(a) of the Federal-Aid Highway Act of 1968, approved August 23, 1968 (82 Stat. 827; Public Law 90-495; D.C. Code, sec. 9-107.01, note), for which funds are provided by this appropriation title, shall expire on September 30, 1996, except authorizations for projects as to which funds have been obligated in whole or in part prior to September 30, 1996: Provided further, That upon expiration of any such project authorization the funds provided herein for the project shall lapse.

Appropriations authorized: Public Law 104-194, 110 Stat. 2362, the District of Columbia Appropriations Act, 1997, provided for construction projects an increase of $46,923,000 (including an increase of $34,000,000 for the highway trust fund, reallocations and rescissions for a net rescission of $120,496,000 from local funds appropriated under this heading in prior fiscal years and an additional $133,419,000 in Federal funds), as authorized by §§ 34-2405.01 through 34-2405.08; §§ 34-2413.08, 34-2413.10 and 34-2304; and §§ 10-619 and 47-3404; including acquisition of sites, preparation of plans and specifications, conducting preliminary surveys, erection of structures, including building improvement and alteration and treatment of grounds, to remain available until expended: Provided, That funds for use of each capital project implementing agency shall be managed and controlled in accordance with all procedures and limitations established under the Financial Management System: Provided further, That all funds provided by this appropriation title shall be available only for the specific projects and purposes intended: Provided further, That notwithstanding the foregoing, all authorizations for capital outlay projects, except those projects covered by the first sentence of section 23(a) of the Federal-Aid Highway Act of 1968, approved August 23, 1968 (82 Stat. 827; Public Law 90-495; D.C. Code, sec. 9-107.01, note), for which funds are provided by this appropriation title, shall expire on September 30, 1998, except authorizations for projects as to which funds have been obligated in whole or in part prior to September 30, 1998: Provided further, That upon expiration of any such project authorization the funds provided herein for the project shall lapse.